District of Columbia statutes.
38-823.01

Local food sourcing, reimbursement, and education.

Public schools and public charter schools shall serve locally grown, locally processed, and unprocessed foods from growers engaged in sustainable agriculture practices whenever possible. Preference shall be given to fresh unprocessed agricultural products grown and processed in the District of Columbia, Maryland, and Virginia.

July 27, 2010, D.C. Law 18-209, § 301, 57 DCR 4779
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 4062(g) of Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-413, July 25, 2012, 59 DCR 9290).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 4062(g) of Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-383, June 19, 2012, 59 DCR 7764).
This section is referenced in § 38-826.02.